Nebraska, session 109, LB1252.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1252 LB1252
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2701 Sections 77-2701 to 77-27,135.01, 77-27,222, 77-27,235,
77-27,236, and 77-27,238 to 77-27,242 and section 3 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2701.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2701.04 For purposes of sections 77-2701.04 to 77-2713 and
77-27,239 and section 3 of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the definitions found in sections 77-2701.05 to 77-2701.56
shall be used.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Motor vehicle means (i) any self-propelled vehicle that is
designed primarily for travel on public roads and that is generally and
commonly used to transport persons and property over public roads or (ii)
a low-speed electric vehicle. Motor vehicle does not include personal
delivery devices, electric bicycles, electric scooters, low-power
scooters, wheelchairs, or vehicles moved solely by human power;
(b) Personal delivery device means an autonomously operated robot
that:
(i) Is designed and manufactured for the purpose of transporting
tangible personal property primarily on sidewalks, crosswalks, and other
public rights-of-way that are typically used by pedestrians;
(ii) Weighs no more than five hundred fifty pounds, excluding any
tangible personal property being transported; and
(iii) Is operated at speeds of less than ten miles per hour when on
sidewalks, crosswalks, and other public rights-of-way that are typically
used by pedestrians;
(c) Retail delivery means a retail sale of tangible personal
property for delivery by a motor vehicle to the purchaser at a location
in this state that includes at least one item of tangible personal
-2-

LB1252 LB1252
2026 2026
property that is subject to the sales and use tax. Each such retail sale
is a single retail delivery regardless of the number of shipments
necessary to deliver the tangible personal property purchased;
(d) Tangible personal property means corporeal personal property.
Tangible personal property includes all goods, wares, merchandise,
products and commodities, and all tangible or corporeal things and
substances that are dealt in and capable of being possessed and
exchanged. Tangible personal property does not include newspapers or
preprinted newspaper supplements that become attached to or inserted in
and distributed with such newspapers; and
(e) Wholesale sale means a sale to retail merchants, jobbers,
dealers, or wholesalers for resale. Wholesale sale does not include sales
to users or consumers not for resale.
(2) A fee of twenty-seven cents is hereby imposed on every retail
delivery of tangible personal property.
(3) The fee imposed by this section shall not apply to:
(a) Retail delivery of tangible personal property that is exempt
from sales and use taxes;
(b) Retail delivery by any entity that is exempt from sales and use
taxes;
(c) Retail delivery by a new business during the year such business
was formed;
(d) Retail delivery by a business during any year when the business
had less than five hundred thousand dollars in retail sales for the
previous year; and
(e) Delivery of tangible personal property that is a wholesale sale.
(4) The fee shall be paid by the purchaser or seller, collected by
the seller, and remitted to and enforced by the Department of Revenue.
(5) All fees remitted to the Department of Revenue under this
section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Property Tax Credit Cash Fund.
-3-

LB1252 LB1252
2026 2026
(6) The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 5. Original sections 77-2701 and 77-2701.04, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-4-